Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.274

Judicial dissolution.

On application by a member or manager the superior courts may order dissolution of a limited liability company whenever: (1) It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the limited liability company's activities in conformity with the certificate of formation and the limited liability company agreement; or (2) other circumstances render dissolution equitable.

[ 2015 c 188 s 53.]